Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB350.
hereby enacts as follows:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 Section 1. Section 2104(4) of Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2104. Rules of succession.The provisions of this chapter shall be applied to both real and personal estate in accordance with the following rules:* * *(4) After-born persons; time of determining relationships.--Persons begotten before the decedent's death, including a person conceived by assisted reproduction and established to be a child of the decedent under 23 Pa.C.S. § 9708 (relating to parentage status of deceased individual), 9813 (relating to gestational surrogacy agreement; parentage status of deceased intended parent) or 9825 (relating to genetic surrogacy agreement; parentage status of deceased intended parent), but born thereafter, shall take as if they had been born in his lifetime.* * *Section 2. Title 20 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3332.1. Liability of executor.If a decedent's estate is not notified of a transfer of a gamete or embryo as required under 23 Pa.C.S. § 9708(b)(2)(ii) (relating to parentage status of deceased individual), 9813(b)(3) (relating to gestational surrogacy agreement; parentage status of deceased intended parent) or 9825(b)(3) (relating to genetic surrogacy agreement; parentage status of deceased intended parent), and as a result a parent-child relationship between the decedent and the person conceived by assisted reproduction is not established, an executor is not liable to the person for a distribution of the estate of the decedent in reliance on the fact that the relationship was not established.20250HB0350PN1880 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Sections 2503(b) and (d), 2504(c), 2513(b) and 4305(b)(1) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 2503. Hearing.* * *(b) Notice.--(1) At least ten days' notice of the hearing shall be given to the petitioner, and a copy of the notice shall be given to the other parent, to the putative father whose parental rights could be terminated pursuant to subsection (d) and to the parents or guardian of a petitioner who has not reached 18 years of age.(2) The notice to the petitioner shall state the following:"To: (insert petitioner's name)A petition has been filed asking the court to put an end to all rights you have to your child (insert name of child). The court has set a hearing to consider ending your rights to your child. That hearing will be held in (insert place, giving reference to exact room and building number or designation) on (insert date) at (insert time). Your presence is required at the hearing. You have a right to be represented at the hearing by a lawyer. You should take this paper to your lawyer at once. If you do not have a lawyer or cannot afford one, go to or telephone the office set forth below to find out where you can get legal help.(Name)....................(Address)...........................................(Telephone number)........"20250HB0350PN1880 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The copy of the notice which is given to the putative father shall state that his rights may also be subject to termination pursuant to subsection (d) if he [fails to file either an acknowledgment of paternity or claim of paternity pursuant to section 5103 (relating to acknowledgment and claim of paternity)] has not filed an acknowledgment or indexed claim of parentage pursuant to Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage) and fails to either appear at the hearing for the purpose of objecting to the termination of his rights or file a written objection to such termination with the court prior to the hearing.* * *(d) Putative father.--If a putative father will not file a petition to voluntarily relinquish his parental rights pursuant to section 2501 (relating to relinquishment to agency) or 2502 (relating to relinquishment to adult intending to adopt child), has been given notice of the hearing being held pursuant to this section and fails to either appear at that hearing for the purpose of objecting to termination of his parental rights or file a written objection to such termination with the court prior to the hearing and has not filed an acknowledgment [of paternity or claim of paternity pursuant to section 5103] or indexed claim of parentage pursuant to Chapter 93, the court may enter a decree terminating the parental rights of the putative father pursuant to subsection (c).* * *§ 2504. Alternative procedure for relinquishment.* * *(c) Putative father.--If a putative father will not execute 20250HB0350PN1880 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a consent to an adoption as required by section 2711, has been given notice of the hearing being held pursuant to this section and fails to either appear at that hearing for the purpose of objecting to termination of his parental rights or file a written objection to such termination with the court prior to the hearing and has not filed an acknowledgment [of paternity or claim of paternity pursuant to section 5103 (relating to acknowledgment and claim of paternity)] or indexed claim of parentage pursuant to Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage), the court may enter a decree terminating the parental rights of the putative father pursuant to subsection (b).* * *§ 2513. Hearing.* * *(b) Notice.--At least ten days' notice shall be given to the parent or parents, putative father, or parent of a minor parent whose rights are to be terminated, by personal service or by registered mail to his or their last known address or by such other means as the court may require. A copy of the notice shall be given in the same manner to the other parent, putative father or parent or guardian of a minor parent whose rights are to be terminated. A putative father shall include one who has filed [a claim of paternity as provided in section 5103 (relating to acknowledgment and claim of paternity)] an acknowledgment or indexed claim of parentage as provided in Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage) prior to the institution of proceedings. The notice shall state the following:"A petition has been filed asking the court to put an end 20250HB0350PN1880 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to all rights you have to your child (insert name of child). The court has set a hearing to consider ending your rights to your child. That hearing will be held in (insert place, giving reference to exact room and building number or designation) on (insert date) at (insert time). You are warned that even if you fail to appear at the scheduled hearing, the hearing will go on without you and your rights to your child may be ended by the court without your being present. You have a right to be represented at the hearing by a lawyer. You should take this paper to your lawyer at once. If you do not have a lawyer or cannot afford one, go to or telephone the office set forth below to find out where you can get legal help.(Name)...................(Address).........................................(Telephone number)......."* * *§ 4305. General administration of support matters.* * *(b) Additional powers.--Subject to the supervision and direction of the court but without the need for prior judicial order, the domestic relations section shall have the power to expedite the establishment and enforcement of support to:(1) Order genetic testing for the purpose of [paternity establishment pursuant to section 4343 (relating to paternity).] establishing parentage under section 9607 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with alleged genetic parent).* * *20250HB0350PN1880 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Section 4343 of Title 23 is repealed:[§ 4343. Paternity.(a) Determination.--Where the paternity of a child born out of wedlock is disputed, the determination of paternity shall be made by the court in a civil action without a jury. A putative father may not be prohibited from initiating a civil action to establish paternity. The burden of proof shall be by a preponderance of the evidence. Bills for pregnancy, childbirth, postnatal care related to the pregnancy and genetic testing are admissible as evidence without requiring third-party foundation testimony and shall constitute prima facie evidence of amounts incurred for such services or for testing on behalf of the child. If there is clear and convincing evidence of paternity on the basis of genetic tests or other evidence, the court shall upon motion of a party issue a temporary order of support pending the judicial resolution of a dispute regarding paternity. The Supreme Court shall provide by general rule for entry of a default order establishing paternity upon a showing of service of process on the defendant and a subsequent failure to appear for scheduled genetic testing.(b) Limitation of actions.--(1) An action or proceeding under this chapter to establish the paternity of a child born out of wedlock must be commenced within 18 years of the date of birth of the child.(2) As of August 16, 1984, the requirement of paragraph (b)(1) shall also apply to any child for whom paternity has not yet been established and any child for whom a paternity action was brought but dismissed because of a prior statute of limitations of less than 18 years.20250HB0350PN1880 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Genetic tests.--(1) Upon the request of any party to an action to establish paternity, supported by a sworn statement from the party, the court or domestic relations section shall require the child and the parties to submit to genetic tests. The domestic relations section shall obtain an additional genetic test upon the request and advance payment by any party who contests the initial test.(2) Genetic test results indicating a 99% or greater probability that the alleged father is the father of the child shall create a presumption of paternity which may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence that the results of the genetic tests are not reliable in that particular case.(3) To ensure the integrity of the specimen and that the proper chain of custody has been maintained, the genetic tests of the biological mother, the child or children in question and the alleged father should be conducted by an established genetic-testing laboratory in the course of its regularly conducted business activity, and certified records should be issued. The certified records shall be admissible into evidence without further foundation, authentication or proof of accuracy if no objection is made within ten days prior to trial. The laboratory must be certified by either the American Association of Blood Banks or the American Association for Histocompatibility and Immunogenetics.(4) If the court or domestic relations section orders genetic testing, the domestic relations section shall pay the cost of the test, subject to recoupment from the alleged father if paternity is established.20250HB0350PN1880 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) A determination of paternity made by another state, whether through judicial proceedings, administrative proceedings or by acknowledgment of paternity, shall be given full faith and credit in the courts of this Commonwealth.(6) A determination of nonpaternity made by another state with respect to a public assistance recipient shall not be binding upon the Department of Public Welfare unless the defendant shows that the department had actual notice of the proceedings, including the date and time of any trial, and a fair opportunity to participate in all material proceedings through counsel of its own choice.]Section 5. Section 4352(a) of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 4352. Continuing jurisdiction over support orders.(a) General rule.--The court making an order of support shall at all times maintain jurisdiction of the matter for the purpose of enforcement of the order and for the purpose of increasing, decreasing, modifying or rescinding the order unless otherwise provided by Part VIII (relating to uniform interstate family support) [or], VIII-A (relating to intrastate family support) or IX-A (relating to Uniform Parentage Act) without limiting the right of the obligee, or the department if it has an assignment or other interest, to institute additional proceedings for support in any county in which the obligor resides or in which property of the obligor is situated. The Supreme Court shall by general rule establish procedures by which each interested party shall be notified of all proceedings in which support obligations might be established or modified and shall receive a copy of any order issued in a case within 14 days after issuance of such order. A petition for modification of a support order may be filed at any time and shall be granted 20250HB0350PN1880 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the requesting party demonstrates a substantial change in circumstances.* * *Section 6. Section 5103 of Title 23 is repealed:[§ 5103. Acknowledgment and claim of paternity.(a) Acknowledgment of paternity.--The father of a child born to an unmarried woman may file with the Department of Public Welfare, on forms prescribed by the department, an acknowledgment of paternity of the child which shall include the consent of the mother of the child, supported by her witnessed statement subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities). In such case, the father shall have all the rights and duties as to the child which he would have had if he had been married to the mother at the time of the birth of the child, and the child shall have all the rights and duties as to the father which the child would have had if the father had been married to the mother at the time of birth. The hospital or other person accepting an acknowledgment of paternity shall provide written and oral notice, which may be through the use of video or audio equipment, to the birth mother and birth father of the alternatives to, the legal consequences of and the rights and responsibilities that arise from, signing the acknowledgment.(b) Claim of paternity.--If the mother of the child fails or refuses to join in the acknowledgment of paternity provided for in subsection (a), the Department of Public Welfare shall index it as a claim of paternity. The filing and indexing of a claim of paternity shall not confer upon the putative father any rights as to the child except that the putative father shall be entitled to notice of any proceeding brought to terminate any 20250HB0350PN1880 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parental rights as to the child.(c) Duty of hospital or birthing center.--Upon the birth of a child to an unmarried woman, an agent of the hospital or birthing center where the birth occurred shall:(1) Provide the newborn's birth parents with an opportunity to complete an acknowledgment of paternity. The completed, signed and witnessed acknowledgment shall be sent to the Department of Public Welfare. A copy shall be given to each of the birth parents. This acknowledgment shall contain:(i) A signed, witnessed statement subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) by the birth mother consenting to the acknowledgment of paternity.(ii) A signed, witnessed statement subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 by the birth father acknowledging his paternity.(iii) A written explanation of the parental duties and parental rights which arise from signing such a statement.(iv) The Social Security numbers and addresses of both birth parents.(2) Provide written information, furnished by the department to the birth mother and birth father, which explains the benefits of having the child's paternity established, the availability of paternity establishment services and the availability of child support enforcement agencies.(d) Conclusive evidence.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an acknowledgment of paternity shall constitute conclusive evidence of paternity without further 20250HB0350PN1880 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 judicial ratification in any action to establish support. The court shall give full faith and credit to an acknowledgment of paternity signed in another state according to its procedures.(e) Transfer.--The Department of Health shall transfer to the Department of Public Welfare all acknowledgments or claims of paternity filed with the Department of Health under prior statutes.(f) Certifications.--The Department of Public Welfare shall provide necessary certifications under Part III (relating to adoption) as to whether any acknowledgment or claim of paternity has been filed in regard to any child who is a prospective adoptive child.(g) Rescission.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a signed, voluntary, witnessed acknowledgment of paternity subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 shall be considered a legal finding of paternity, subject to the right of any signatory to rescind the acknowledgment within the earlier of the following:(i) sixty days; or(ii) the date of an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the child, including, but not limited to, a domestic relations section conference or a proceeding to establish a support order in which the signatory is a party.(2) After the expiration of the 60 days, an acknowledgment of paternity may be challenged in court only on the basis of fraud, duress or material mistake of fact, which must be established by the challenger through clear and convincing evidence. An order for support shall not be 20250HB0350PN1880 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 suspended during the period of challenge except for good cause shown.(h) Penalties for noncompliance.--The department may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $500 per day upon a hospital or birthing center which is not in compliance with the provisions of this section. A penalty under this subsection is subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(i) Status of father.--The name of the father shall be included on the record of birth of the child of unmarried parents only if one of the following applies:(1) The father and mother have signed a voluntary acknowledgment of paternity.(2) A court or administrative agency of competent jurisdiction has issued an adjudication of paternity.]Section 7. Section 7201(a) of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 7201. Bases for jurisdiction over nonresident.(a) Jurisdiction.--In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage of a child, a tribunal of this State may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual or the individual's guardian or conservator if any of the following apply:(1) The individual is personally served with a writ of summons, complaint or other appropriate pleading within this State.(2) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this State by consent in a record, by entering a general appearance or by filing a responsive document having the effect of waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction.20250HB0350PN1880 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The individual resided with the child in this State.(4) The individual resided in this State and provided prenatal expenses or support for the child.(5) The child resides in this State as a result of the acts or directives of the individual.(6) The individual engaged in sexual intercourse in this State and the child may have been conceived by that act of intercourse.(7) The individual acknowledged parentage of the child [on a form filed with the department under section 5103 (relating to acknowledgment and claim of paternity)] under Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage).(8) There is any other basis consistent with the constitutions of this State and the United States for the exercise of personal jurisdiction.* * *Section 8. Title 23 is amended by adding a part to read:PART IX-AUNIFORM PARENTAGE ACTChapter91. General Provisions92. Parent-child Relationship93. Voluntary Acknowledgment of Parentage94. (Reserved)95. Genetic Testing96. Proceeding to Adjudicate Parentage97. Assisted Reproduction98. Surrogacy Agreement99. Information about Donor20250HB0350PN1880 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 99A. Miscellaneous ProvisionsCHAPTER 91GENERAL PROVISIONSSec.9101. Short title of part.9102. Definitions.9103. Scope of part.9104. Applicable law.9105. Data privacy.9106. Construction.§ 9101. Short title of part.This part shall be known as the Uniform Parentage Act.§ 9102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acknowledged parent." An individual who has established a parent-child relationship under Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage)."Active petition." A petition which has been served and not withdrawn."Adjudicated parent." An individual who has been adjudicated to be a parent of a child by a court with jurisdiction."Alleged genetic parent." An individual who is alleged to be, or alleges that the individual is, a genetic parent or possible genetic parent of a child whose parentage has not been adjudicated. The term does not include:(1) a presumed parent;20250HB0350PN1880 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) an individual whose parental rights have been terminated or declared not to exist; or(3) a donor."Assisted reproduction." A method of causing pregnancy other than sexual intercourse. The term includes:(1) intrauterine, intracervical or vaginal insemination;(2) donation of gametes;(3) donation of embryos;(4) in vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; and(5) intracytoplasmic sperm injection."Birth." Includes stillbirth."Child." An individual of any age whose parentage may be determined under this part."Child-support agency." A government entity, public official or private agency authorized to provide parentage-establishment services under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.)."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Determination of parentage." Establishment of a parent-child relationship by a judicial or administrative proceeding or otherwise under this part."Donor." An individual who provides gametes intended for use in assisted reproduction, whether or not for consideration. The term does not include:(1) an individual who gives birth to a child conceived by assisted reproduction, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 98 (relating to surrogacy agreement); or(2) a parent under Chapter 97 (relating to assisted reproduction) or an intended parent under Chapter 98."Gamete." A sperm or an egg.20250HB0350PN1880 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Genetic testing." An analysis of genetic markers to identify or exclude a genetic relationship."Intended parent." An individual, married or unmarried, who manifests an intent to be legally bound as a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction."Minor." An unemancipated individual under 18 years of age."Parent." An individual who has established a parent-child relationship under section 9201 (relating to establishment of parent-child relationship)."Parentage" or "parent-child relationship." The legal relationship between a child and a parent of the child."Petition." A pleading which commences an action under this part."Presumed parent." An individual who, under section 9204 (relating to presumption of parentage), is presumed to be a parent of a child, unless the presumption is overcome in a judicial proceeding, a valid denial of parentage is made under Chapter 93 or a court adjudicates the individual to be a parent."Record." Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form."Sign." With present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:(1) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or(2) to attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound or process."Signatory." An individual who signs a record."State." A state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or any territory or insular possession under the jurisdiction of the 20250HB0350PN1880 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe."Transfer." A procedure for assisted reproduction by which a gamete or embryo is placed in the body of an individual who will give birth to a child."Witnessed." The act in which at least one individual who is authorized to sign has signed a record to verify that the individual personally observed a signatory sign the record.§ 9103. Scope of part.(a) General rule.--This part applies to an adjudication or determination of parentage.(b) Construction.--This part does not create, affect, enlarge or diminish parental rights or duties under the law of this Commonwealth other than this part.(c) Inconsistency.--Except as otherwise provided in this part, if there is an inconsistency between a provision of this part and another statutory provision, the provision of this part prevails.§ 9104. Applicable law.The court shall apply the law of this Commonwealth to adjudicate parentage. The applicable law does not depend on:(1) the place of birth of the child; or(2) the past or present residence of the child.§ 9105. Data privacy.A proceeding under this part is subject to the law of this Commonwealth other than this part which governs the health, safety, privacy and liberty of a child or other individual who could be affected by disclosure of information that could identify the child or other individual, including address, telephone number, digital contact information, place of 20250HB0350PN1880 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment, Social Security number and the child's day-care CHILD-CARE facility or school. § 9106. Construction.(a) Equal application.--To the extent practicable, a provision of this part applicable to a father-child relationship or a mother-child relationship applies to any parent-child relationship.(b) Application to State plan.--This part shall be applied in accordance with the Department of Human Services' federally approved State plan for child support.CHAPTER 92PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIPSec.9201. Establishment of parent-child relationship.9202. No discrimination.9203. Consequences of establishing parentage.9204. Presumption of parentage.§ 9201. Establishment of parent-child relationship.A parent-child relationship is established between an individual and a child if:(1) the individual gives birth to the child, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 98 (relating to surrogacy agreement);(2) there is a presumption under section 9204 (relating to presumption of parentage) of the individual's parentage of the child, unless the presumption is overcome in a judicial proceeding or a valid denial of parentage is made under Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage);(3) the individual is adjudicated a parent of the child 20250HB0350PN1880 - 19 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under Chapter 96 (relating to proceeding to adjudicate parentage);(4) the individual adopts the child;(5) the individual acknowledges parentage of the child under Chapter 93, unless the acknowledgment is rescinded under section 9308 (relating to procedure for rescission) or successfully challenged under Chapter 93 or 96;(6) the individual's parentage of the child is established under Chapter 97 (relating to assisted reproduction); or(7) the individual's parentage of the child is established under Chapter 98.§ 9202. No discrimination.A parent-child relationship extends equally to every child and parent, regardless of the marital status or gender of the parent or the circumstances of the child's birth.§ 9203. Consequences of establishing parentage.Unless parental rights are terminated, a parent-child relationship established under this part applies for all purposes.§ 9204. Presumption of parentage.(a) General rule.--An individual is presumed to be a parent of a child if:(1) when the child was born:(i) that individual and the individual who gave birth to the child were married to each other, regardless of whether the marriage was valid or could later be declared invalid; and(ii) there is no active petition for divorce, dissolution or annulment; or20250HB0350PN1880 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) during the time the child was a minor, it is determined by clear and convincing evidence that the individual openly held out the child as the individual's child and:(i) resided in the same household as the child; or(ii) provided support for the child.(b) Effect of presumption of parentage.--A presumption of parentage under this section may be overcome and competing claims to parentage may be resolved only by an adjudication under Chapter 96 (relating to proceeding to adjudicate parentage) or a valid denial of parentage under Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage).CHAPTER 93VOLUNTARY ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF PARENTAGESec.9301. Acknowledgment of parentage.9302. Execution of acknowledgment of parentage.9303. Denial of parentage.9304. Rules for acknowledgment or denial of parentage.9305. Effect of acknowledgment or denial of parentage.9306. No filing fee.9307. Ratification barred.9308. Procedure for rescission.9309. Challenge after expiration of period for rescission.9310. Procedure for challenge by signatory.9311. Full faith and credit.9312. Forms for acknowledgment and denial of parentage.9313. Release of information.9314. Regulations.§ 9301. Acknowledgment of parentage.20250HB0350PN1880 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Who may sign acknowledgment.--Except as provided in subsection (c), the individual who gave birth to a child and any of the following may sign an acknowledgment of parentage to establish the parentage of the child:(1) A presumed parent of the child.(2) An alleged genetic parent of the child.(3) An intended parent of the child under Chapter 97 (relating to assisted reproduction).(b) Opportunity to complete and sign acknowledgment.--If a child is born in a hospital, birthing center or other facility, an agent of the facility shall provide the individual who gave birth to the child and any of the other individuals listed in subsection (a) seeking to establish a parent-child relationship with the child with a form acknowledgment of parentage and an opportunity to complete and sign the form and have their signatures attested or witnessed as required under section 9302(a)(1) (relating to execution of acknowledgment of parentage).(c) Acknowledgment not signed by individual who gave birth.--If the individual who gave birth to the child refuses to sign an acknowledgment of parentage under this section, the Department of Human Services shall accept for filing the acknowledgment of parentage and index the acknowledgment as a claim of parentage by the other individual seeking to establish the parentage of the child. The filing and indexing shall not confer on the other individual any rights regarding the child except that the other individual is entitled to notice of any proceeding brought to terminate any parental rights to the child provided by other law.(d) Certifications.--The Department of Human Services shall 20250HB0350PN1880 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide necessary certifications under Part III (relating to adoption) as to whether any acknowledgment or claim of parentage has been filed or indexed in regard to a child who is a prospective adoptive child.§ 9302. Execution of acknowledgment of parentage.(a) General rule.--An acknowledgment of parentage under section 9301 (relating to acknowledgment of parentage) must:(1) be in a record signed by the individual who gave birth to the child and by the individual seeking to establish parentage, and the signatures must be attested by a notarial officer or witnessed;(2) state that the child whose parentage is being acknowledged:(i) does not have a presumed parent other than the individual seeking to establish parentage of the child or has a presumed parent whose full name is stated; and(ii) does not have another acknowledged parent, adjudicated parent or individual who is a parent of the child under Chapter 97 (relating to assisted reproduction) or 98 (relating to surrogacy agreement) other than the individual who gave birth to the child; and(3) state that the signatories understand that the acknowledgment is the equivalent of an adjudication of parentage of the child and that a challenge to the acknowledgment is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred two years after the effective date of the acknowledgment.(b) Void acknowledgment of parentage.--An acknowledgment of parentage is void if, at the time of signing:20250HB0350PN1880 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) an individual other than the individual seeking to establish parentage is a presumed parent, unless a denial of parentage by the presumed parent in a signed record is filed with the Department of Human Services; or(2) an individual, other than the individual who gave birth to the child or the individual seeking to establish parentage, is an acknowledged or adjudicated parent or a parent under Chapter 97 or 98.§ 9303. Denial of parentage.A presumed parent or alleged genetic parent may sign a denial of parentage in a record. The denial of parentage is valid only if:(1) an acknowledgment of parentage by another individual is filed under section 9305 (relating to effect of acknowledgment or denial of parentage);(2) the signatures are attested by a notarial officer or witnessed; and(3) the presumed parent or alleged genetic parent has not previously:(i) completed a valid acknowledgment of parentage, unless the previous acknowledgment was rescinded under section 9308 (relating to procedure for rescission) or challenged successfully under section 9309 (relating to challenge after expiration of period for rescission); or(ii) been adjudicated to be a parent of the child.§ 9304. Rules for acknowledgment or denial of parentage.(a) General rule.--An acknowledgment of parentage and a denial of parentage may be contained in a single record or may be in counterparts and may be filed with the Department of Human Services separately or simultaneously. If filing of the 20250HB0350PN1880 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acknowledgment and denial both are required under this part, neither is effective until both are filed.(b) Time period for signing.--An acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage may be signed before or after the birth of the child.(c) Effective date.--Subject to subsection (a), an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage takes effect on the birth of the child or filing of the record with the Department of Human Services, whichever occurs later.(d) Validity.--An acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage signed by a minor is valid if the acknowledgment complies with this part.§ 9305. Effect of acknowledgment or denial of parentage.(a) Acknowledgment of parentage.--Except as otherwise provided in sections 9308 (relating to procedure for rescission) and 9309 (relating to challenge after expiration of period for rescission), an acknowledgment of parentage that complies with this chapter and is filed with the Department of Human Services is equivalent to an adjudication of parentage of the child and confers on the acknowledged parent all rights and duties of a parent.(b) Denial of parentage.--Except as otherwise provided in sections 9308 and 9309, a denial of parentage which complies with this chapter and is filed with the Department of Human Services with an acknowledgment of parentage that complies with this chapter is equivalent to an adjudication that the presumed parent or alleged genetic parent is not a parent and is discharged from all rights and duties of a parent.§ 9306. No filing fee.The Department of Human Services may not charge a fee for 20250HB0350PN1880 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filing an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage.§ 9307. Ratification barred.A court conducting a judicial proceeding or an administrative agency conducting an administrative proceeding is not required or permitted to ratify an unchallenged acknowledgment of parentage.§ 9308. Procedure for rescission.(a) General rule.--A signatory may rescind an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage by filing with the Department of Human Services a rescission in a signed record which is attested by a notarial officer or witnessed. The filing must occur before the earlier of:(1) sixty days after the effective date under section 9304 (relating to rules for acknowledgment or denial of parentage) of the acknowledgment or denial; or(2) the date of the first hearing before a court in a proceeding, to which the signatory is a party, to adjudicate an issue relating to the child, including a proceeding that establishes support.(b) Associated denial of parentage.--If an acknowledgment of parentage is rescinded under subsection (a), an associated denial of parentage is invalid, and the Department of Human Services shall notify the individual who gave birth to the child and the individual who signed a denial of parentage of the child that the acknowledgment has been rescinded. Failure to give the notice required by this subsection does not affect the validity of the rescission.§ 9309. Challenge after expiration of period for rescission.(a) Signatories.--After the period for rescission under section 9308 (relating to procedure for rescission) expires, but 20250HB0350PN1880 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not later than two years after the effective date under section 9304 (relating to rules for acknowledgment or denial of parentage) of an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage, a signatory of the acknowledgment or denial may commence a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial, including a challenge brought under section 9614 (relating to precluding establishment of parentage by perpetrator of sexual assault), only on the basis of fraud, duress or material mistake of fact.(b) Nonsignatories.--A challenge to an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage by an individual who was not a signatory to the acknowledgment or denial is governed by section 9610 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with acknowledged parent).§ 9310. Procedure for challenge by signatory.(a) Parties.--Every signatory to an acknowledgment of parentage and any related denial of parentage must be made a party to a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial.(b) Personal jurisdiction.--By signing an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage, a signatory submits to personal jurisdiction in this Commonwealth in a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial, effective on the filing of the acknowledgment or denial with the Department of Human Services.(c) Suspension of legal responsibilities.--The court may not suspend the legal responsibilities arising from an acknowledgment of parentage, including the duty to pay child support, during the pendency of a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or a related denial of parentage, unless the party challenging the acknowledgment or denial shows good cause.20250HB0350PN1880 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Burden of proof.--A party challenging an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage has the burden of proof.(e) Order to amend birth record.--If the court determines that a party has satisfied the burden of proof under subsection (d), the court shall order the department to amend the birth record of the child to reflect the legal parentage of the child.(f) Conduct of proceedings.--A proceeding to challenge an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage must be conducted under Chapter 96 (relating to proceeding to adjudicate parentage).§ 9311. Full faith and credit.The court shall give full faith and credit to an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage effective in another state if the acknowledgment or denial is in a signed record and otherwise complies with the law of the other state.§ 9312. Forms for acknowledgment and denial of parentage.(a) Duty to prescribe forms.--The Department of Human Services shall prescribe forms for an acknowledgment of parentage, denial of parentage, rescission of acknowledgment and rescission of denial.(b) Effect of later modification.--A valid acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage is not affected by a later modification of the form under subsection (a).§ 9313. Release of information.The Department of Human Services may release information relating to an acknowledgment of parentage, a denial of parentage or a related rescission to any of the following: (1) A signatory of the acknowledgment of parentage, denial of parentage or related rescission.(2) A court.20250HB0350PN1880 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A child 18 years of age or older who is the subject of the acknowledgment of parentage, denial of parentage or related rescission.(4) A Federal agency or a child-support agency of this or another state.§ 9314. Regulations.The Department of Human Services may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this chapter.CHAPTER 94(Reserved)CHAPTER 95GENETIC TESTINGSec.9501. Definitions.9502. Scope of chapter; limitation on use of genetic testing.9503. Authority to order or deny genetic testing.9504. Requirements for genetic testing.9505. Report of genetic testing.9506. Genetic testing results; challenge to results.9507. Cost of genetic testing.9508. Additional genetic testing.9509. Genetic testing when specimen not available.9510. Deceased individual.9511. Identical siblings.9512. Confidentiality of genetic testing.§ 9501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Combined relationship index." The product of all tested 20250HB0350PN1880 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relationship indices."Ethnic or racial group." For the purpose of genetic testing, a recognized group or groups that an individual identifies as the individual's ancestry or part of the ancestry or that is identified by other information."Hypothesized genetic relationship." An asserted genetic relationship between an individual and a child."Probability of parentage." For the ethnic or racial group to which an individual alleged to be a parent belongs, the probability that a hypothesized genetic relationship is supported, compared to the probability that a genetic relationship is supported between the child and a random individual of the ethnic or racial group used in the hypothesized genetic relationship, expressed as a percentage incorporating the combined relationship index and a prior probability."Relationship index." A likelihood ratio that compares the probability of a genetic marker given a hypothesized genetic relationship and the probability of the genetic marker given a genetic relationship between the child and a random individual of the ethnic or racial group used in the hypothesized genetic relationship.§ 9502. Scope of chapter; limitation on use of genetic testing.(a) General rule.--This chapter governs genetic testing of an individual in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage, whether the individual:(1) voluntarily submits to testing; or(2) is tested under an order of the court or a child-support agency.(b) Prohibited uses.--Genetic testing may not be used:20250HB0350PN1880 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) to challenge the parentage status of an individual who is a parent under Chapter 97 (relating to assisted reproduction) or 98 (relating to surrogacy agreement); or(2) to establish the parentage status of an individual who is a donor.§ 9503. Authority to order or deny genetic testing.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or Chapter 96 (relating to proceeding to adjudicate parentage), in a proceeding under this part to determine parentage, the court shall order the child and any other individual to submit to genetic testing if a request for testing is supported by the sworn statement of a party:(1) alleging a reasonable possibility that the individual is the child's genetic parent; or(2) denying genetic parentage of the child and stating facts establishing a reasonable possibility that the individual is not a genetic parent.(b) When permitted.--The court or a child-support agency may order genetic testing only if there is no presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated parent of a child other than the individual who gave birth to the child.(c) In utero genetic testing prohibited.--The court or child-support agency may not order in utero genetic testing.(d) Multiple individuals.--If two or more individuals are subject to court-ordered genetic testing, the court may order that testing be completed concurrently or sequentially.(e) Subjects.--Genetic testing of an individual who gave birth to a child is not a condition precedent to testing of the child and another individual whose genetic parentage of the child is being determined. If the individual who gave birth is 20250HB0350PN1880 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unavailable or declines to submit to genetic testing, the court may order genetic testing of the child and each other individual whose genetic parentage of the child is being adjudicated.(f) Discretion to deny motion.--In a proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child having a presumed parent or an individual who claims to be a parent under section 9609 (relating to adjudicating claim of de facto parentage of child), or to challenge an acknowledgment of parentage, the court may deny a motion for genetic testing of the child and any other individual after considering the factors in section 9613(a) and (b) (relating to adjudicating competing claims of parentage).(g) Conditions requiring denial of motion.--If an individual requesting genetic testing is barred under Chapter 96 from establishing the individual's parentage status, the court shall deny the request for genetic testing.(h) Enforcement.--An order under this section for genetic testing is enforceable by contempt.§ 9504. Requirements for genetic testing.(a) Types authorized.--Genetic testing must be of a type reasonably relied on by experts in the field of genetic testing and performed in a testing laboratory accredited by:(1) the AABB, formerly known as the American Association of Blood Banks, or a successor to its functions; or(2) an accrediting body designated by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.(b) Specimens.--A specimen used in genetic testing may consist of a sample or a combination of samples of blood, buccal cells, bone, hair or other body tissue or fluid. The specimen used in the testing need not be of the same kind for each individual undergoing genetic testing.20250HB0350PN1880 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Calculation of relationship index.--Based on the ethnic or racial group of an individual undergoing genetic testing, a testing laboratory shall determine the databases from which to select frequencies for use in calculating a relationship index. If an individual or a child-support agency objects to the laboratory's choice, the following rules apply:(1) Not later than 30 days after receipt of the report of the test, the objecting individual or child-support agency may request the court to require the laboratory to recalculate the relationship index using an ethnic or racial group different from that used by the laboratory.(2) The individual or the child-support agency objecting to the laboratory's choice under this subsection shall:(i) if the requested frequencies are not available to the laboratory for the ethnic or racial group requested, provide the requested frequencies compiled in a manner recognized by accrediting bodies; or(ii) engage another laboratory to perform the calculations.(3) The laboratory may use its own statistical estimate if there is a question of which ethnic or racial group is appropriate. The laboratory shall calculate the frequencies using statistics, if available, for any other ethnic or racial group requested.(d) Discretion to require additional genetic testing.--If, after recalculation of the relationship index under subsection (c) using a different ethnic or racial group, genetic testing under section 9506 (relating to genetic testing results; challenge to results) does not identify an individual as a genetic parent of a child, the court may require an individual 20250HB0350PN1880 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who has been tested to submit to additional genetic testing to identify a genetic parent.§ 9505. Report of genetic testing.(a) Requirements.--A report of genetic testing must be in a record and signed under penalty of perjury by a designee of the testing laboratory. A report complying with the requirements of this chapter is self-authenticating.(b) Admissibility of documentation.--Documentation from a testing laboratory of the following information is sufficient to establish a reliable chain of custody and allow the results of genetic testing to be admissible without testimony:(1) the name and photograph of each individual whose specimen has been taken;(2) the name of the individual who collected each specimen;(3) the place and date each specimen was collected;(4) the name of the individual who received each specimen in the testing laboratory; and(5) the date each specimen was received.§ 9506. Genetic testing results; challenge to results.(a) General rule.--Subject to a challenge under subsection (b), an individual is identified under this part as a genetic parent of a child if genetic testing complies with this chapter and the results of the testing disclose:(1) that the individual has at least a 99% probability of parentage, using a prior probability of 0.50, as calculated by using the combined relationship index obtained in the testing; and(2) a combined relationship index of at least 100 to 1.(b) When challenge permitted.--An individual identified 20250HB0350PN1880 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under subsection (a) as a genetic parent of the child may challenge the genetic testing results only by other genetic testing satisfying the requirements of this chapter which:(1) excludes the individual as a genetic parent of the child; or(2) identifies another individual as a possible genetic parent of the child other than:(i) the individual who gave birth to the child; or(ii) the individual identified under subsection (a).(c) Discretion to require further genetic testing.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9511 (relating to identical siblings), if more than one individual other than the individual who gave birth is identified by genetic testing as a possible genetic parent of the child, the court shall order each individual to submit to further genetic testing to identify a genetic parent.§ 9507. Cost of genetic testing.(a) General rule.--Subject to assessment of fees under Chapter 96 (relating to proceeding to adjudicate parentage), payment of the cost of initial genetic testing must be made:(1) by a child-support agency in a proceeding in which the child-support agency provides services;(2) by the individual who made the request for genetic testing;(3) as agreed by the parties; or(4) as ordered by the court.(b) Reimbursement authorized.--If the cost of genetic testing is paid by the child-support agency, the child-support agency may seek reimbursement from the genetic parent whose parent-child relationship is established.20250HB0350PN1880 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9508. Additional genetic testing.The court or child-support agency shall order additional genetic testing on request of an individual who contests the result of the initial testing under section 9506 (relating to genetic testing results; challenge to results). If initial genetic testing under section 9506 identifies an individual as a genetic parent of the child, the court or agency may not order additional testing unless the contesting individual pays for the testing in advance.§ 9509. Genetic testing when specimen not available.(a) Individuals subject to.--Subject to subsection (b), if a genetic testing specimen is not available from an alleged genetic parent of a child, an individual seeking genetic testing demonstrates good cause and the court finds that the circumstances are just, the court may order any of the following individuals to submit specimens for genetic testing:(1) a parent of the alleged genetic parent;(2) a sibling of the alleged genetic parent;(3) another child of the alleged genetic parent and the individual who gave birth to the other child; and(4) another relative of the alleged genetic parent necessary to complete genetic testing.(b) Balancing test.--To issue an order under this section, the court must find that a need for genetic testing outweighs the legitimate interests of the individual sought to be tested.§ 9510. Deceased individual.If an individual seeking genetic testing demonstrates good cause, the court may order genetic testing of a deceased individual.§ 9511. Identical siblings.20250HB0350PN1880 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) General rule.--If the court finds there is reason to believe that an alleged genetic parent has an identical sibling and evidence that the sibling may be a genetic parent of the child, the court may order genetic testing of the sibling.(b) Nongenetic evidence.--If more than one sibling is identified under section 9506 (relating to genetic testing results; challenge to results) as a genetic parent of the child, the court may rely on nongenetic evidence to adjudicate which sibling is a genetic parent of the child.§ 9512. Confidentiality of genetic testing.(a) General rule.--Release of a report of genetic testing for parentage is controlled by the law of this Commonwealth other than this part.(b) Penalty.--An individual who intentionally releases an identifiable specimen of another individual collected for genetic testing under this chapter for a purpose not relevant to a proceeding regarding parentage, without a court order or written permission of the individual who furnished the specimen, commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.CHAPTER 96PROCEEDING TO ADJUDICATE PARENTAGESubchapterA. Nature of ProceedingB. Special Rules for Proceeding to Adjudicate ParentageC. Hearing and AdjudicationSUBCHAPTER ANATURE OF PROCEEDINGSec.9601. Proceeding authorized.9602. Standing to maintain proceeding.20250HB0350PN1880 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9603. Notice of proceeding.9604. Personal jurisdiction.9605. Venue.§ 9601. Proceeding authorized.(a) General rule.--A proceeding may be commenced to adjudicate the parentage of a child. Except as otherwise provided in this part, the proceeding is governed by the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure.(b) Exception.--A proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child born under a surrogacy agreement is governed by this chapter and Chapter 98 (relating to surrogacy agreement).§ 9602. Standing to maintain proceeding.Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage) and sections 9608 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with presumed parent), 9609 (relating to adjudicating claim of de facto parentage of child), 9610 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with acknowledged parent) and 9611 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with adjudicated parent), a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be maintained by:(1) the child;(2) the individual who gave birth to the child, unless a court has adjudicated that the individual is not a parent;(3) an individual who is a parent under this part;(4) an individual whose parentage of the child is to be adjudicated;(5) a child-support agency;(6) an adoption agency authorized by the law of this Commonwealth other than this part or a licensed child-placement agency; or20250HB0350PN1880 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) a representative authorized by the law of this Commonwealth other than this part to act for an individual who otherwise would be entitled to maintain a proceeding but is deceased, incapacitated or a minor.§ 9603. Notice of proceeding.(a) Individuals entitled to notice.--The petitioner shall give notice of a proceeding to adjudicate parentage to the following individuals:(1) the individual who gave birth to the child, unless a court has adjudicated that the individual is not a parent;(2) an individual who is a parent of the child under this part;(3) a presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated parent of the child;(4) an individual whose parentage of the child will be adjudicated; and(5) a legal custodian of the child under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters).(b) Right to intervene.--An individual entitled to notice under subsection (a) has a right to intervene in the proceeding.(c) Effect of lack of notice.--Lack of notice required by subsection (a) does not render a judgment void. Lack of notice does not preclude an individual entitled to notice under subsection (a) from bringing a proceeding under section 9611(b) (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with adjudicated parent).§ 9604. Personal jurisdiction.(a) General rule.--The court may adjudicate an individual's parentage of a child only if the court has personal jurisdiction over the individual.20250HB0350PN1880 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Nonresidents, guardians and conservators.--A court of this Commonwealth with jurisdiction to adjudicate parentage may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual, or the guardian or conservator of the individual, if the conditions prescribed in section 7201 (relating to bases for jurisdiction over nonresident) are satisfied.(c) Multiple individuals.--Lack of jurisdiction over one individual does not preclude the court from making an adjudication of parentage binding on another individual.§ 9605. Venue.Venue for a proceeding to adjudicate parentage shall be in the county where:(1) the assisted reproduction resulting in the child occurred or will occur;(2) the child is or will be born;(3) the child resides or is located;(4) if the child does not reside in this Commonwealth, the respondent resides or is located; or(5) a proceeding has been commenced for administration of the estate of an individual who is or may be a parent under this part.SUBCHAPTER BSPECIAL RULES FOR PROCEEDING TO ADJUDICATE PARENTAGESec.9606. Admissibility of results of genetic testing.9607. Adjudicating parentage of child with alleged genetic parent.9608. Adjudicating parentage of child with presumed parent.9609. Adjudicating claim of de facto parentage of child.9610. Adjudicating parentage of child with acknowledged parent.20250HB0350PN1880 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9611. Adjudicating parentage of child with adjudicated parent.9612. Adjudicating parentage of child of assisted reproduction.9613. Adjudicating competing claims of parentage.9614. Precluding establishment of parentage by perpetrator of sexual assault.§ 9606. Admissibility of results of genetic testing.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9502(b) (relating to scope of chapter; limitation on use of genetic testing), the court shall admit a report of genetic testing ordered by the court under section 9503 (relating to authority to order or deny genetic testing) as evidence of the truth of the facts asserted in the report.(b) Objection.--A party may object to the admission of a report described in subsection (a) not later than 14 days after the party receives the report. The party shall cite specific grounds for exclusion.(c) Expert testimony.--A party that objects to the results of genetic testing may call a genetic testing expert to testify in person or by another method approved by the court. Unless the court orders otherwise, the party offering the testimony bears the expense for the expert testifying.(d) Factors not affecting admissibility.--Admissibility of a report of genetic testing is not affected by whether the testing was performed:(1) voluntarily or under an order of the court or a child-support agency; or(2) before, on or after commencement of the proceeding.§ 9607. Adjudicating parentage of child with alleged genetic parent.(a) General rule.--A proceeding to determine whether an 20250HB0350PN1880 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alleged genetic parent who is not a presumed parent is a parent of a child may be commenced:(1) before the child becomes an adult; or(2) after the child becomes an adult, but only if the child initiates the proceeding.(b) Sole claimant.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9614 (relating to precluding establishment of parentage by perpetrator of sexual assault), this subsection applies in a proceeding described in subsection (a) if the individual who gave birth to the child is the only other individual with a claim to parentage of the child. The court shall adjudicate an alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child if the alleged genetic parent:(1) is identified under section 9506 (relating to genetic testing results; challenge to results) as a genetic parent of the child and the identification is not successfully challenged under section 9506;(2) admits parentage in a pleading, when making an appearance or during a hearing, the court accepts the admission, and the court determines the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child;(3) declines to submit to genetic testing ordered by the court or a child-support agency, in which case the court may adjudicate the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child even if the alleged genetic parent denies a genetic relationship with the child;(4) is in default after service of process and the court determines the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child; or(5) is neither identified nor excluded as a genetic 20250HB0350PN1880 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parent by genetic testing and, based on other evidence, the court determines the alleged genetic parent to be a parent of the child.(c) Multiple individuals with claims.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9614 and subject to other limitations in this chapter, if in a proceeding involving an alleged genetic parent at least one other individual in addition to the individual who gave birth to the child has a claim to parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate parentage under section 9613 (relating to adjudicating competing claims of parentage).§ 9608. Adjudicating parentage of child with presumed parent.(a) Time period for commencing.--A proceeding to determine whether a presumed parent is a parent of a child may be commenced:(1) before the child becomes an adult; or(2) after the child becomes an adult, but only if the child initiates the proceeding.(b) Effect of presumption of parentage.--A presumption of parentage under section 9204 (relating to presumption of parentage) cannot be overcome after the child attains two years of age unless the court determines:(1) that the presumed parent is not a genetic parent, never resided with the child and never held out the child as the presumed parent's child; or(2) the child has more than one presumed parent.(c) Sole claimant.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9614 (relating to precluding establishment of parentage by perpetrator of sexual assault), the following rules apply in a proceeding to adjudicate a presumed parent's parentage of a child if the individual who gave birth to the child is the only 20250HB0350PN1880 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other individual with a claim to parentage of the child:(1) If no party to the proceeding challenges the presumed parent's parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate the presumed parent to be a parent of the child.(2) If the presumed parent is identified under section 9506 (relating to genetic testing results; challenge to results) as a genetic parent of the child and that identification is not successfully challenged under section 9506, the court shall adjudicate the presumed parent to be a parent of the child.(3) If the presumed parent is not identified under section 9506 as a genetic parent of the child and the presumed parent or the individual who gave birth to the child challenges the presumed parent's parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate the parentage of the child in the best interest of the child based on the factors under section 9613(a) and (b) (relating to adjudicating competing claims of parentage).(d) Multiple individuals with claims.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9614 and subject to other limitations in this chapter, if in a proceeding to adjudicate a presumed parent's parentage of a child another individual in addition to the individual who gave birth to the child asserts a claim to parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate parentage under section 9613.§ 9609. Adjudicating claim of de facto parentage of child.(a) Individuals entitled to commence proceeding.--A proceeding to establish parentage of a child under this section may be commenced only by an individual who:(1) is alive when the proceeding is commenced; and20250HB0350PN1880 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) claims to be a de facto parent of the child.(b) Time period for commencing.--An individual who claims to be a de facto parent of a child must commence a proceeding to establish parentage of a child under this section:(1) before the child attains 18 years of age; and(2) while the child is alive.(c) Standing.--The following rules govern standing of an individual who claims to be a de facto parent of a child to maintain a proceeding under this section:(1) The individual must file an initial verified pleading alleging specific facts that support the claim to parentage of the child asserted under this section. The verified pleading must be served on all parents and legal guardians of the child and any other party to the proceeding.(2) An adverse party, parent or legal guardian may file a pleading in response to the pleading filed under paragraph (1). A responsive pleading must be verified and must be served on all persons served with the pleading filed under paragraph (1).(3) Unless the court finds a hearing is necessary to determine the sufficiency of the pleadings or to determine the disputed facts material to the issue of standing, the court shall determine, based on the pleadings under paragraphs (1) and (2), whether the individual has alleged facts sufficient to satisfy by a preponderance of the evidence the requirements of subsection (d). If the court holds a hearing under this subsection, the hearing must be held on an expedited basis.(d) Individual with sole claim.--In a proceeding to adjudicate parentage of an individual who claims to be a de 20250HB0350PN1880 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facto parent of the child, if there is only one other individual who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate the individual who claims to be a de facto parent to be a parent of the child if the individual demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that:(1) the individual resided with the child as a regular member of the child's household for a significant period;(2) the individual engaged in consistent caretaking of the child;(3) the individual undertook full and permanent responsibilities of a parent of the child without expectation of financial compensation other than public assistance;(4) the individual held out the child as the individual's child;(5) the individual established a bonded and dependent relationship with the child which is parental in nature;(6) another parent of the child fostered or supported the bonded and dependent relationship required under paragraph (5); and(7) continuing the relationship between the individual and the child is in the best interest of the child.(e) Multiple individuals with claims.--Subject to other limitations in this chapter, if in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage of an individual who claims to be a de facto parent of the child there is more than one other individual who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the child and the court determines that the requirements of subsection (d) are satisfied, the court shall adjudicate parentage under section 9613 (relating to adjudicating competing claims of parentage).(f) In loco parentis status.--Failure to seek to establish 20250HB0350PN1880 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parentage under this section does not affect an individual's ability to seek in loco parentis status under law of this Commonwealth other than this part.§ 9610. Adjudicating parentage of child with acknowledged parent.(a) General rule.--If a child has an acknowledged parent, a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment of parentage or a denial of parentage brought by a signatory to the acknowledgment or denial is governed by sections 9309 (relating to challenge after expiration of period for rescission) and 9310 (relating to procedure for challenge by signatory).(b) Procedure.--If a child has an acknowledged parent, the following rules apply in a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment of parentage or a denial of parentage brought by an individual, other than the child, who has standing under section 9602 (relating to standing to maintain proceeding) and was not a signatory to the acknowledgment or denial:(1) The individual must commence the proceeding not later than two years after the effective date of the acknowledgment.(2) The court may permit the proceeding only if the court finds that permitting the proceeding is in the best interest of the child.(3) If the court permits the proceeding, the court shall adjudicate parentage under section 9613 (relating to adjudicating competing claims of parentage).§ 9611. Adjudicating parentage of child with adjudicated parent.(a) General rule.--If a child has an adjudicated parent, a proceeding to challenge the adjudication, brought by an 20250HB0350PN1880 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual who was a party to the adjudication or received notice under section 9603 (relating to notice of proceeding), is governed by the rules governing a collateral attack on a judgment.(b) Procedure.--If a child has an adjudicated parent, the following rules apply to a proceeding to challenge the adjudication of parentage brought by an individual other than the child who has standing under section 9602 (relating to standing to maintain proceeding) and was not a party to the adjudication and did not receive notice under section 9603:(1) The individual must commence the proceeding not later than two years after the effective date of the adjudication.(2) The court may permit the proceeding only if the court finds that permitting the proceeding is in the best interest of the child.(3) If the court permits the proceeding, the court shall adjudicate parentage under section 9613 (relating to adjudicating competing claims of parentage).§ 9612. Adjudicating parentage of child of assisted reproduction.(a) General rule.--An individual who is a parent under Chapter 97 (relating to assisted reproduction) or the individual who gave birth to the child may bring a proceeding to adjudicate parentage. If the court determines that the individual is a parent under Chapter 97, the court shall adjudicate the individual to be a parent of the child.(b) Multiple individuals with claims.--In a proceeding to adjudicate an individual's parentage of a child, if another individual other than the individual who gave birth to the child 20250HB0350PN1880 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is a parent under Chapter 97, the court shall adjudicate the individual's parentage of the child under section 9613 (relating to adjudicating competing claims of parentage).§ 9613. Adjudicating competing claims of parentage.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9614 (relating to precluding establishment of parentage by perpetrator of sexual assault), in a proceeding to adjudicate competing claims of, or challenges under sections 9608(c) (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with presumed parent), 9610 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with acknowledged parent) or 9611 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with adjudicated parent) to, parentage of a child by two or more individuals, the court shall adjudicate parentage in the best interest of the child, based on:(1) the age of the child;(2) the length of time during which each individual assumed the role of parent of the child;(3) the nature of the relationship between the child and each individual;(4) the harm to the child if the relationship between the child and each individual is not recognized;(5) the basis for each individual's claim to parentage of the child; and(6) other equitable factors arising from the disruption of the relationship between the child and each individual or the likelihood of other harm to the child.(b) Factors to be considered.--If an individual challenges parentage based on the results of genetic testing, in addition to the factors listed in subsection (a), the court shall consider:20250HB0350PN1880 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) the facts surrounding the discovery that the individual might not be a genetic parent of the child; and(2) the length of time between the time that the individual was placed on notice that the individual might not be a genetic parent and the commencement of the proceeding.§ 9614. Precluding establishment of parentage by perpetrator of sexual assault.(a) (Reserved).(b) Sexual assault.--Except as provided in subsection (c), in a proceeding in which an individual alleges that the individual's pregnancy or the birth resulting from that pregnancy is the result of a sexual assault, the individual may seek to preclude the alleged perpetrator of the sexual assault from establishing parentage of the child.(c) Nonapplicability.--This section does not apply if:(1) the alleged perpetrator under subsection (b) has previously been adjudicated to be a parent of the child; or(2) after the birth of the child, the alleged perpetrator under subsection (b) established a bonded and dependent relationship with the child which is parental in nature.(d) Limitation.--Unless section 9309 (relating to challenge after expiration of period for rescission) or 9607 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with alleged genetic parent) applies, a petition making an allegation under subsection (b) must be filed not later than two years after the birth of the child. The petition must be filed only in a proceeding to establish parentage under this part.(e) Evidentiary standard.--An allegation under subsection (b) may be proved by:20250HB0350PN1880 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) evidence that the alleged perpetrator under subsection (b) was convicted of a sexual assault, or a comparable crime in another jurisdiction, against the individual who gave birth to the child and the child was born not later than 300 days after the sexual assault; or(2) clear and convincing evidence that the alleged perpetrator under subsection (b) committed sexual assault, or a comparable crime in another jurisdiction, against the individual who gave birth to the child and the child was born not later than 300 days after the sexual assault.(f) Duty of court.--If the court determines that an allegation has been proven under subsection (e), the court shall:(1) adjudicate that the alleged perpetrator under subsection (b) is not a parent of the child;(2) require the department to amend the birth certificate if requested by the individual who gave birth to the child and the court determines that the amendment is in the best interest of the child; and(3) require the perpetrator under subsection (b) to pay child support, birth-related costs or both, unless the individual who gave birth to the child requests otherwise and the court determines that granting the request is in the best interest of the child.(g) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "sexual assault" means the offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).SUBCHAPTER CHEARING AND ADJUDICATIONSec.20250HB0350PN1880 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9615. Temporary order.9616. Combining proceedings.9617. Proceeding before birth.9618. Child as party; representation.9619. Court to adjudicate parentage.9620. Hearing; inspection of records.9621. Dismissal for want of prosecution.9622. Order adjudicating parentage.9623. Binding effect of determination of parentage.§ 9615. Temporary order.(a) General rule.--In a proceeding under this chapter, the court may issue a temporary order for child support if the order is consistent with the law of this Commonwealth other than this part and the individual ordered to pay support is:(1) a presumed parent of the child;(2) petitioning to be adjudicated a parent;(3) identified as a genetic parent through genetic testing under section 9506 (relating to genetic testing results; challenge to results);(4) an alleged genetic parent who has declined to submit to genetic testing;(5) shown by clear and convincing evidence to be a parent of the child; or(6) an acknowledged parent, an intended parent or any other parent under this part.(b) Custody and visitation provisions.--A temporary order may include a provision for custody and visitation under the law of this Commonwealth other than this part.§ 9616. Combining proceedings.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in 20250HB0350PN1880 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b), the court may combine a proceeding to adjudicate parentage under this part with a proceeding for adoption, termination of parental rights, child custody or visitation, child support, divorce, dissolution or annulment, administration of an estate or another appropriate proceeding.(b) Prohibition.--A respondent may not combine a proceeding described in subsection (a) with a proceeding to adjudicate parentage brought under Part VIII (relating to uniform interstate family support).§ 9617. Proceeding before birth.Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 98 (relating to surrogacy agreement), a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be commenced before the birth of the child and an order or judgment may be entered before birth, but enforcement of the order or judgment must be stayed until the birth of the child.§ 9618. Child as party; representation.(a) Minor child as party.--A minor child is a proper party but not a necessary party to a proceeding under this chapter.(b) Representation of child.--The court shall appoint an attorney or guardian ad litem to represent a child in a proceeding under this chapter if the court finds that the interests of the child are not adequately represented.§ 9619. Court to adjudicate parentage.The court shall adjudicate parentage of a child without a jury.§ 9620. Hearing; inspection of records.(a) Closure of proceeding.--On request of a party and for good cause, the court may close a proceeding under this chapter to the public.(b) Final order and other documents.--A final order in a 20250HB0350PN1880 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceeding under this chapter is available for public inspection. Other papers and records are available for public inspection only with the consent of the parties or by court order.§ 9621. Dismissal for want of prosecution.The court may dismiss a proceeding under this part for want of prosecution only without prejudice. An order of dismissal for want of prosecution purportedly with prejudice is void and has only the effect of a dismissal without prejudice.§ 9622. Order adjudicating parentage.(a) Identification of child.--An order adjudicating parentage must identify the child in a manner provided by the law of this Commonwealth other than this part.(b) Fees, costs and expenses.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), the court may assess filing fees, reasonable attorney fees, fees for genetic testing, other costs and necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred in a proceeding under this chapter. Attorney fees awarded under this subsection may be paid directly to the attorney and the attorney may enforce the order in the attorney's own name.(c) Child-support agency.--The court may not assess fees, costs or expenses in a proceeding under this chapter against a child-support agency of this Commonwealth or another state, except as provided by the law of this Commonwealth other than this part.(d) Admissibility of genetic testing and health care bills.--In a proceeding under this chapter, a copy of a bill for genetic testing or prenatal or postnatal health care for the individual who gave birth to the child and the child provided to the adverse party not later than 10 days before a hearing is 20250HB0350PN1880 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 admissible to establish:(1) the amount of the charge billed; and(2) that the charge is reasonable and necessary.(e) Child name changes.--On request of a party and for good cause, the court in a proceeding under this chapter may order the name of the child changed. If the court order changing the name varies from the name on the birth certificate of the child, the court shall order the department to issue an amended birth certificate.§ 9623. Binding effect of determination of parentage.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b):(1) a signatory to an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage is bound by the acknowledgment and denial as provided in Chapter 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage); and(2) a party to an adjudication of parentage by a court acting under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdiction requirements of section 7201 (relating to bases for jurisdiction over nonresident) and any individual who received notice of the proceeding are bound by the adjudication.(b) Children.--A child is not bound by a determination of parentage under this part unless:(1) the determination of parentage was based on an unrescinded acknowledgment of parentage and the acknowledgment is consistent with the results of genetic testing;(2) the determination of parentage was based on a finding consistent with the results of genetic testing and 20250HB0350PN1880 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the consistency is declared in the determination or otherwise shown;(3) the determination of parentage was made under Chapter 97 (relating to assisted reproduction) or 98 (relating to surrogacy agreement); or(4) the child was a party or was represented by an attorney or guardian ad litem in the proceeding.(c) Other proceedings.--In a proceeding for divorce, dissolution or annulment, the court is deemed to have made an adjudication of parentage of a child if the court acts under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdiction requirements of section 7201 and the final order:(1) expressly identifies the child as a "child of the marriage" or "issue of the marriage" or includes similar words indicating that both spouses are parents of the child; or(2) provides for support of the child by a spouse unless that spouse's parentage of the child is disclaimed specifically in the order.(d) Defense available to nonparties.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) or section 9611 (relating to adjudicating parentage of child with adjudicated parent), a determination of parentage may be asserted as a defense in a subsequent proceeding seeking to adjudicate parentage status of an individual who was not a party to the earlier proceeding.(e) Challenges to adjudication by parties.--A party to an adjudication of parentage may challenge the adjudication only under the law of this Commonwealth other than this part relating to appeal, vacation of judgment or other judicial review.CHAPTER 9720250HB0350PN1880 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSISTED REPRODUCTIONSec.9701. Scope of chapter.9702. Parental status of donor.9703. Parentage of child of assisted reproduction.9704. Consent to assisted reproduction.9705. Limitation on spouse's dispute of parentage.9706. Effect of certain legal proceedings regarding marriage.9707. Withdrawal of consent.9708. Parentage status of deceased individual.9709. Order or judgment of parentage.§ 9701. Scope of chapter.This chapter does not apply to the birth of a child conceived by sexual intercourse or assisted reproduction under a surrogacy agreement under Chapter 98 (relating to surrogacy agreement).§ 9702. Parental status of donor.A donor is not a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction.§ 9703. Parentage of child of assisted reproduction.An individual who consents under section 9704 (relating to consent to assisted reproduction) to assisted reproduction with another individual who agrees to give birth to a child conceived by the assisted reproduction with the intent to be a parent of the child is a parent of the child.§ 9704. Consent to assisted reproduction.(a) Proof.--Except as provided in subsection (b), consent under section 9703 (relating to parentage of child of assisted reproduction) must be established:(1) in a record signed before, on or after the birth of the child by the individual giving birth to the child and by 20250HB0350PN1880 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 another individual who intends to be a parent of the child; or(2) by both individuals agreeing, before conception or birth of the child, that they would be parents of the child.(b) Exception.--In the absence of evidence under subsection (a), consent may be established if the court finds that the individual who did not give birth to the child resided with the child after birth and assumed the role of a parent of the child.§ 9705. Limitation on spouse's dispute of parentage.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), if an individual who gives birth to a child by assisted reproduction has a spouse at the time of a child's birth, the spouse may not challenge the spouse's parentage of the child unless:(1) not later than two years after the birth of the child, the spouse commences a proceeding to adjudicate the spouse's parentage of the child; and(2) the court finds the spouse did not consent to the assisted reproduction before, on or after birth of the child or withdrew consent under section 9707 (relating to withdrawal of consent).(b) Time period to commence proceeding.--A proceeding to adjudicate a spouse's parentage of a child born by assisted reproduction may be commenced at any time if the court determines:(1) the spouse neither provided a gamete for, nor consented to, the assisted reproduction;(2) the spouse and the individual who gave birth to the child have not cohabited since the probable time of assisted reproduction; and20250HB0350PN1880 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) the spouse never openly held out the child as the spouse's child.(c) Applicability.--This section applies to a spouse's dispute of parentage even if the spouse's marriage is declared invalid after assisted reproduction occurs.§ 9706. Effect of certain legal proceedings regarding marriage.(a) Former spouse.--If a marriage of an individual who gives birth to a child conceived by assisted reproduction is terminated through divorce or dissolution, or annulled before transfer of gametes or embryos to the individual, a former spouse of the individual is not a parent of the child unless the former spouse consented in a record that the former spouse would be a parent of the child if assisted reproduction were to occur after a divorce, dissolution or annulment and the former spouse did not withdraw consent under section 9707 (relating to withdrawal of consent).(b) After commencement of proceeding.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a current spouse of an individual who gives birth to a child conceived by assisted reproduction is not a parent of the child if, prior to the transfer of gametes, there is an active petition commencing an action for divorce, dissolution or annulment.(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply if, during the pendency of an action under paragraph (1), both parties consent in a record to be parents of the child.(3) A married individual proceeding with assisted reproduction under this subsection may not use gametes of the individual's spouse unless both parties, during the pendency of the action under paragraph (1), consent in a record to the use of the spouse's gametes for assisted reproduction by the 20250HB0350PN1880 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 married individual.§ 9707. Withdrawal of consent.(a) General rule.--An individual who consents under section 9704 (relating to consent to assisted reproduction) to assisted reproduction may withdraw consent any time before a transfer that results in a pregnancy by giving notice in a record of the withdrawal of consent to the individual who agreed to give birth to a child conceived by assisted reproduction and to any clinic or health care provider facilitating the assisted reproduction. Failure to give notice to the clinic or health care provider does not affect a determination of parentage under this part.(b) Effect of withdrawal.--An individual who withdraws consent under subsection (a) is not a parent of the child under this chapter.§ 9708. Parentage status of deceased individual.(a) Death after gamete or embryo transfer.--If an individual who intends to be a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction dies during the period between the transfer of a gamete or embryo and the birth of the child, the individual's death does not preclude the establishment of the individual's parentage of the child if the individual otherwise would be a parent of the child under this part.(b) Death before gamete or embryo transfer.--If an individual who consented in a record to assisted reproduction by an individual who agreed to give birth to a child dies before a transfer of gametes or embryos, the deceased individual is not a parent of a child conceived by the assisted reproduction unless all of the following paragraphs apply:(1) one of the following applies:(i) the individual consented in a record that if 20250HB0350PN1880 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assisted reproduction were to occur after the death of the individual, the individual would be a parent of the child; or(ii) the individual's intent to be a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction after the individual's death is established by clear and convincing evidence; and(2) both of the following apply:(i) the transfer of the gamete or embryo occurs not later than 36 months after the individual's death or the birth of the child occurs not later than 45 months after the individual's death; and(ii) the estate of the deceased individual is notified not later than six months after the individual's death that the transfer may occur.§ 9709. Order or judgment of parentage.(a) Permissible relief.--The individual who consents under section 9704 (relating to consent to assisted reproduction) to assisted reproduction or the individual who agrees to give birth to a child conceived by the assisted reproduction may commence a proceeding in court for an order or judgment under this section.(b) Issuance of order or judgment.--If the individual commencing the action establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that one of the elements described in section 9704 exists, the court shall issue an order or judgment:(1) declaring that the individual, or the individual commencing the action and the other individual, is the intended parent, or intended parents, of the child immediately upon the birth of the child;(2) ordering that parental rights and duties vest 20250HB0350PN1880 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 immediately on the birth of the child exclusively in each intended parent; and(3) designating the content of the birth record in accordance with law and directing the department to designate each intended parent as a parent of the child.(c) Order or judgment before birth.--The court may issue an order or judgment under this section before the birth of the child. The court shall stay enforcement of the order or judgment until the birth of the child.(d) Limitation on necessary parties.--Neither the Commonwealth, the department nor the hospital, birthing center or other facility where the child is or is expected to be born is a necessary party to a proceeding under this section.CHAPTER 98SURROGACY AGREEMENTSubchapterA. General RequirementsB. Special Rules for Gestational Surrogacy AgreementC. Special Rules for Genetic Surrogacy AgreementSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL REQUIREMENTSSec.9801. Definitions.9802. Eligibility to enter into surrogacy agreement.9803. Requirements of surrogacy agreement: process.9804. Requirements of surrogacy agreements: content.9805. Surrogacy agreement: effect of subsequent change of marital status.9806. Inspection of documents and records.9807. Exclusive, continuing jurisdiction.20250HB0350PN1880 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9801. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Genetic surrogate." An individual who is not an intended parent and who agrees to become pregnant through assisted reproduction using the individual's own gamete, under a genetic surrogacy agreement as provided in this chapter."Gestational surrogate." An individual who is not an intended parent and who agrees to become pregnant through assisted reproduction using gametes that are not her own, under a gestational surrogacy agreement as provided in this chapter."Surrogacy agreement." An agreement between one or more intended parents and an individual who is not an intended parent and the individual's spouse, in which the individual agrees to become pregnant through assisted reproduction and which provides that each intended parent is a parent of a child conceived under the agreement. Unless otherwise specified, the term refers to both a gestational surrogacy agreement and a genetic surrogacy agreement."Surrogate." A genetic surrogate or a gestational surrogate.§ 9802. Eligibility to enter into surrogacy agreement.(a) Requirements for surrogates.--To execute a surrogacy agreement, an individual who desires to be a surrogate must:(1) have attained 21 years of age;(2) previously have given birth to at least one child;(3) complete a medical evaluation related to the surrogacy arrangement by a licensed medical doctor;(4) complete a mental health consultation by a licensed mental health professional; and20250HB0350PN1880 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) have independent legal representation by an attorney, licensed to practice law in this Commonwealth, of the individual's choice throughout the negotiation process and the execution and duration of the surrogacy agreement regarding the terms of the surrogacy agreement and the potential legal consequences of the agreement.(b) Requirements for intended parents.--To execute a surrogacy agreement, each intended parent, whether or not genetically related to the child, must:(1) have attained 21 years of age;(2) complete a mental health consultation by a licensed mental health professional; and(3) have independent legal representation by an attorney, licensed to practice law in this Commonwealth, of the intended parent's choice, throughout the negotiation, execution and duration of the surrogacy agreement, regarding the terms of the surrogacy agreement and the potential legal consequences of the agreement.§ 9803. Requirements of surrogacy agreement: process.A surrogacy agreement must be executed in compliance with the following rules:(1) At least one party must be a resident of this Commonwealth or, if no party is a resident of this Commonwealth:(i) the birth will, or is anticipated to, occur in this Commonwealth; or(ii) the assisted reproduction to be performed under the surrogacy agreement will, or is anticipated to, occur in this Commonwealth.(2) A surrogate and each intended parent must meet the 20250HB0350PN1880 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of section 9802 (relating to eligibility to enter into surrogacy agreement).(3) Each intended parent and the surrogate must be parties to the surrogacy agreement. If the surrogate is married, the surrogate's spouse must be a party to the surrogacy agreement unless there is an active petition for divorce, dissolution or annulment.(4) The surrogacy agreement must be in a record signed by each party listed in paragraph (3).(5) The surrogate and each intended parent must acknowledge in a record receipt of a copy of the surrogacy agreement.(6) The signature of each party to the surrogacy agreement must be attested by a notarial officer or witnessed.(7) The surrogate and the intended parent or parents must have independent legal representation under section 9802(a)(5) and (b)(3), and each counsel must be identified in the surrogacy agreement.(8) The following apply to legal representation for the surrogate:(i) The intended parent or parents must pay for the representation.(ii) The surrogate must give informed consent to the representation.(iii) There may not be interference with the independence of professional judgment or attorney-client relationship.(iv) The representation must be in compliance with the Rules of Professional Conduct.20250HB0350PN1880 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) The surrogacy agreement must be executed before a medical procedure occurs related to the surrogacy agreement, other than the medical evaluation and mental health consultation required by section 9802.§ 9804. Requirements of surrogacy agreements: content.(a) General rule.--A surrogacy agreement must comply with the following requirements:(1) A surrogate agrees to attempt to become pregnant by means of assisted reproduction.(2) Except as otherwise provided in sections 9822 (relating to termination of genetic surrogacy agreement) and 9823(c) (relating to parentage under validated genetic surrogacy agreement), the surrogate and the surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, agree that they have no claim to parentage of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement.(3) If the surrogate's spouse is a party to the surrogate agreement, the spouse must acknowledge and agree to comply with the obligations imposed on the surrogate by the surrogacy agreement.(4) Except as otherwise provided in sections 9822 and 9823(c), the intended parent or, if there are two intended parents, each one jointly and severally, immediately on birth will be the exclusive parent or parents of the child, regardless of number of children born or gender or mental or physical condition of each child.(5) Except as otherwise provided in sections 9822 and 9823(c), the intended parent or, if there are two intended parents, each parent jointly and severally, immediately on birth will assume responsibility for the financial support of 20250HB0350PN1880 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the child, regardless of number of children born or gender or mental or physical condition of each child.(6) The intended parent or parents must agree that they are liable for the surrogacy-related medical expenses of the surrogate, including expenses for health care provided for assisted reproduction, prenatal care, labor and delivery, and for the medical expenses of the resulting child not paid for by insurance. This paragraph shall not be construed to supplant health insurance coverage that is otherwise available to the surrogate or an intended parent. This paragraph shall not be deemed to change the health insurance coverage of the surrogate or the responsibility of an insurance company to pay benefits under a policy that covers the surrogate. The surrogacy agreement under this paragraph must include information disclosing how each intended parent will cover the surrogacy-related medical expenses of the surrogate and the medical expenses of the child.(7) The surrogacy agreement may not infringe on the rights of the surrogate to make all health and welfare decisions regarding the surrogate, the surrogate's body and the surrogate's pregnancy throughout the duration of the surrogacy agreement, including during attempts to become pregnant, delivery and after delivery. The surrogacy agreement may not infringe upon the right of the surrogate to autonomy in medical decision-making, including by requiring the surrogate to undergo a scheduled, non-medically indicated cesarean section or to undergo multiple embryo transfers. The General Assembly finds and declares that an agreement purporting to waive or limit the rights described in this paragraph is void as against public policy.20250HB0350PN1880 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) The surrogacy agreement must include information about each party's right under this chapter to terminate the surrogacy agreement.(b) Additional provisions.--A surrogacy agreement may provide for:(1) payment of consideration and reasonable expenses not required under subsection (a)(6); and(2) reimbursement of specific expenses if the surrogacy agreement is terminated under this chapter.(c) Assignment prohibited.--A right created under a surrogacy agreement is not assignable, and there is no third-party beneficiary of the surrogacy agreement other than the child.§ 9805. Surrogacy agreement: effect of subsequent change of marital status.(a) Surrogates.--Unless a surrogacy agreement expressly provides otherwise:(1) the marriage of a surrogate after the surrogacy agreement is signed by all parties does not affect the validity of the surrogacy agreement, consent to the surrogacy agreement by the surrogate's spouse is not required and the spouse is not a presumed parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement; and(2) the divorce, dissolution or annulment of the surrogate after the surrogacy agreement is signed by all parties does not affect the validity of the surrogacy agreement.(b) Intended parents.--Unless a surrogacy agreement expressly provides otherwise:(1) the marriage of an intended parent after the 20250HB0350PN1880 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surrogacy agreement is signed by all parties does not affect the validity of a surrogacy agreement, the consent of the spouse of the intended parent is not required and the spouse of the intended parent is not, based on the surrogacy agreement, a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement; and(2) the divorce, dissolution or annulment of an intended parent after the surrogacy agreement is signed by all parties does not affect the validity of the surrogacy agreement, and, except as otherwise provided in section 9822 (relating to termination of genetic surrogacy agreement), the intended parents are the parents of the child.§ 9806. Inspection of documents and records.Unless the court orders otherwise, a petition and any other document and record related to a surrogacy agreement filed with the court under this subchapter are not open to inspection by any individual other than the parties to the proceeding, a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement, their attorneys and the department. A court may not authorize any other individual to inspect a document or record related to the surrogacy agreement unless required by exigent circumstances. The individual seeking to inspect the document may be required to pay the expense of preparing a copy of the document to be inspected.§ 9807. Exclusive, continuing jurisdiction.During the period after the execution of a surrogacy agreement until 180 days after the birth of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement, a court conducting a proceeding under this part has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction over all matters arising out of the 20250HB0350PN1880 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surrogacy agreement. This section does not give the court jurisdiction over a child custody proceeding or child support proceeding if jurisdiction is not otherwise authorized by the law of this Commonwealth other than this part.SUBCHAPTER BSPECIAL RULES FOR GESTATIONAL SURROGACY AGREEMENTSec.9811. Termination of gestational surrogacy agreement.9812. Parentage under gestational surrogacy agreement.9813. Gestational surrogacy agreement: parentage status of deceased intended parent.9814. Gestational surrogacy agreement: order of parentage.9815. Effect of gestational surrogacy agreement.§ 9811. Termination of gestational surrogacy agreement.(a) General rule.--A party to a gestational surrogacy agreement may terminate the surrogacy agreement at any time before an embryo transfer by giving notice of termination in a record to all other parties. If an embryo transfer does not result in a pregnancy, a party may terminate the surrogacy agreement at any time before a subsequent embryo transfer.(b) Limited release.--Unless a gestational surrogacy agreement provides otherwise, on termination of the surrogacy agreement under subsection (a), the parties are released from the surrogacy agreement, except that each intended parent remains responsible for expenses that are reimbursable under the surrogacy agreement and incurred by the gestational surrogate through the date of termination.(c) Penalties and liquidated damages prohibited.--Except in a case involving fraud, neither a gestational surrogate nor the gestational surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, is 20250HB0350PN1880 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 liable to the intended parent or parents for a penalty or liquidated damages for terminating a gestational surrogacy agreement under this section.§ 9812. Parentage under gestational surrogacy agreement.(a) Intended parents.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) or section 9813(b) (relating to gestational surrogacy agreement: parentage of deceased intended parent) or 9815 (relating to effect of gestational surrogacy agreement), on the birth of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under a gestational surrogacy agreement, each intended parent is, by operation of law, a parent of the child.(b) Surrogates.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) or section 9815, neither a gestational surrogate nor the gestational surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, is a parent of the child.(c) When genetic testing required.--If a child is alleged to be a genetic child of a gestational surrogate, the court shall order genetic testing of the child. If the child is a genetic child of a gestational surrogate, parentage must be determined based on Chapters 91 (relating to general provisions), 92 (relating to parent-child relationship), 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage), 95 (relating to genetic testing) and 96 (relating to proceeding to adjudicate parentage).(d) Clinical and laboratory errors.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) or section 9813(b) or 9815, if, due to a clinical or laboratory error, a child conceived by assisted reproduction under a gestational surrogacy agreement is not genetically related to an intended parent or a donor who donated to the intended parent or parents, each intended parent, and not 20250HB0350PN1880 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the gestational surrogate and the gestational surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, is a parent of the child, subject to any other claim of parentage.§ 9813. Gestational surrogacy agreement: parentage status of deceased intended parent.(a) Death after gamete or embryo transfer.--Section 9812 (relating to parentage under gestational surrogacy agreement) applies to an intended parent even if the intended parent dies during the period between the transfer of a gamete or embryo and the birth of the child.(b) Death before gamete or embryo transfer.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9815 (relating to effect of gestational surrogacy agreement), an intended parent is not a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under a gestational surrogacy agreement if the intended parent dies before the transfer of a gamete or embryo unless:(1) the surrogacy agreement provides otherwise;(2) the transfer of a gamete or embryo occurs not later than 36 months after the death of the intended parent or birth of the child occurs not later than 45 months after the death of the intended parent; and(3) the estate of the deceased intended parent is notified not later than six months after the death of the intended parent that the transfer may occur.§ 9814. Gestational surrogacy agreement: order of parentage.(a) Permissible relief.--Except as otherwise provided in sections 9812(c) (relating to parentage under gestational surrogacy agreement) or 9815 (relating to effect of gestational surrogacy agreement), before, on or after the birth of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under a gestational surrogacy 20250HB0350PN1880 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreement, a party to the surrogacy agreement may commence a proceeding in court for an order or judgment under subsection (b). The requested order or judgment may be issued before or after the birth of the child as requested by the parties. The surrogate and all intended parents are necessary parties to the proceeding. The petition must be accompanied by all of the following:(1) A certification from the attorney representing the intended parent or parents and from the attorney representing the surrogate that the surrogacy agreement complies with this chapter.(2) A statement from each party to the agreement that the party knowingly and voluntarily entered into the agreement and is requesting the order or judgment. A statement under this paragraph from the surrogate's spouse is not required if there is an active petition for divorce, dissolution or annulment.(b) Issuance of order or judgment.--On receipt of a petition under subsection (a) and accompanying certifications and statements, the court shall issue an order or judgment:(1) declaring that each intended parent is a parent of the child and ordering that parental rights and duties vest immediately on the birth of the child exclusively in each intended parent;(2) declaring that the gestational surrogate and the gestational surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, are not the parents of the child;(3) designating the content of the birth record in accordance with law and directing the department to designate each intended parent as a parent of the child;20250HB0350PN1880 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) to protect the privacy of the child and the parties, declaring that the court record is not open to inspection, except as authorized under section 9806 (relating to inspection of documents and records);(5) declaring that the intended parent or parents shall have exclusive custody and control of the child; and(6) for other relief the court determines necessary and proper.(c) Order or judgment before birth.--The court may issue an order or judgment under subsection (b) before the birth of the child. The court shall stay enforcement of the order or judgment until the birth of the child.(d) Limitation on necessary parties.--Neither the Commonwealth, the department nor the hospital, birthing center or other facility where the child is or is expected to be born is a necessary party to a proceeding under subsection (b).§ 9815. Effect of gestational surrogacy agreement.(a) General rule.--A gestational surrogacy agreement that substantially complies with sections 9802 (relating to eligibility to enter into surrogacy agreement), 9803 (relating to requirements of surrogacy agreement: process) and 9804 (relating to requirements of surrogacy agreement: content) is enforceable.(b) Noncomplying gestational surrogacy agreements.--If a child was conceived by assisted reproduction under a gestational surrogacy agreement that does not substantially comply with sections 9802, 9803 and 9804, the court shall determine the rights and duties of the parties to the surrogacy agreement consistent with the intent of the parties at the time of execution of the surrogacy agreement. Each party to the 20250HB0350PN1880 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surrogacy agreement and any individual who at the time of the execution of the surrogacy agreement was a spouse of a party to the surrogacy agreement has standing to maintain a proceeding to adjudicate an issue related to the enforcement of the surrogacy agreement.(c) Remedies for breach.--Except as expressly provided in a gestational surrogacy agreement or subsection (d), if the surrogacy agreement is breached by the gestational surrogate or one or more intended parents, the nonbreaching party is entitled to the remedies available at law or in equity.(d) When specific performance permitted.--If an intended parent is determined to be a parent of the child, specific performance is a remedy available for:(1) breach of the surrogacy agreement by a gestational surrogate which prevents the intended parent from exercising immediately on birth of the child the full rights of parentage; or(2) breach by the intended parent which prevents the intended parent's acceptance, immediately on birth of the child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement, of the duties of parentage.SUBCHAPTER CSPECIAL RULES FOR GENETIC SURROGACY AGREEMENTSec.9821. Requirements to validate genetic surrogacy agreement.9822. Termination of genetic surrogacy agreement.9823. Parentage under validated genetic surrogacy agreement.9824. Effect of nonvalidated genetic surrogacy agreement.9825. Genetic surrogacy agreement; parentage status of deceased intended parent.20250HB0350PN1880 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9826. Breach of genetic surrogacy agreement.§ 9821. Requirements to validate genetic surrogacy agreement.(a) Prior court approval.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9824 (relating to effect of nonvalidated genetic surrogacy agreement), to be enforceable, a genetic surrogacy agreement must be validated by the court. A proceeding to validate the surrogacy agreement must be commenced before assisted reproduction related to the surrogacy agreement.(b) Conditions.--The court shall issue an order validating a genetic surrogacy agreement if the court finds that:(1) sections 9802 (relating to eligibility to enter into surrogacy agreement), 9803 (relating to requirements of surrogacy agreement: process) and 9804 (relating to requirements of surrogacy agreement: content) are substantially satisfied; and(2) all parties entered into the surrogacy agreement voluntarily and understand its terms.(c) Notice of termination.--An individual who terminates a genetic surrogacy agreement under section 9822 (relating to termination of genetic surrogacy agreement) shall file notice of the termination with the court. On receipt of the notice, the court shall vacate any order issued under subsection (b). An individual who does not notify the court of the termination of the surrogacy agreement is subject to sanctions.§ 9822. Termination of genetic surrogacy agreement.(a) Time.--An intended parent or a genetic surrogate who is a party to the surrogacy agreement may terminate the surrogacy agreement at any time before a gamete or embryo transfer by giving notice of termination in a record to all other parties. If a gamete or embryo transfer does not result in a pregnancy, a 20250HB0350PN1880 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 party may terminate the surrogacy agreement at any time before a subsequent gamete or embryo transfer. The notice of termination must be attested by a notarial officer or witnessed.(b) Limited release.--On termination of a genetic surrogacy agreement, the parties are released from all obligations under the surrogacy agreement, except that each intended parent remains responsible for all expenses incurred by the genetic surrogate through the date of termination, which are reimbursable under the surrogacy agreement.(c) Penalties and liquidated damages prohibited.--Except in a case involving fraud, neither a genetic surrogate nor the genetic surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, is liable to the intended parent or parents for a penalty or liquidated damages for terminating a genetic surrogacy agreement under this section.§ 9823. Parentage under validated genetic surrogacy agreement.(a) Intended parents.--Each intended parent is a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under a surrogacy agreement validated under section 9821 (relating to requirements to validate genetic surrogacy agreement).(b) Court order.--On proof of a court order issued under section 9821 validating the surrogacy agreement, the court shall issue an order:(1) declaring that each intended parent is a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement and ordering that parental rights and duties vest exclusively in each intended parent;(2) declaring that the genetic surrogate and the genetic surrogate's spouse or former spouse, if any, are not parents of the child;20250HB0350PN1880 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) designating the contents of the birth certificate in accordance with the law of this Commonwealth other than this part and directing the department to designate each intended parent as a parent of the child;(4) to protect the privacy of the child and the parties, declaring that the court record is not open to inspection, except as authorized under section 9806 (relating to inspection of documents and records);(5) that the intended parent or parents have exclusive custody and control of the child; and(6) for other relief the court determines necessary and proper.(c) When genetic testing required.--If a child born to a genetic surrogate is alleged not to have been conceived by assisted reproduction, the court shall order genetic testing to determine the genetic parentage of the child. If the child was not conceived by assisted reproduction, parentage must be determined under Chapters 91 (relating to general provisions), 92 (relating to parent-child relationship), 93 (relating to voluntary acknowledgment of parentage), 95 (relating to genetic testing) and 96 (relating to proceeding to adjudicate parentage). Unless the genetic surrogacy agreement provides otherwise, if the child was not conceived by assisted reproduction, the genetic surrogate is not entitled to any nonexpense-related compensation paid for serving as a genetic surrogate.(d) Court order of intended parent.--Unless a genetic surrogate exercises the right under section 9822 (relating to termination of genetic surrogacy agreement) to terminate the genetic surrogacy agreement, if an intended parent fails to file 20250HB0350PN1880 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notice required under section 9822(a), the genetic surrogate or the department may file with the court, not later than 60 days after the birth of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement, notice that the child has been born to the genetic surrogate. On proof of a court order issued under section 9821 validating the surrogacy agreement, the court shall issue an order declaring that each intended parent is a parent of the child.§ 9824. Effect of nonvalidated genetic surrogacy agreement.(a) Enforceable.--A genetic surrogacy agreement, whether or not in a record, that is not validated under section 9821 (relating to requirements to validate genetic surrogacy agreement) is enforceable only to the extent provided in this section and section 9826 (relating to breach of genetic surrogacy agreement).(b) Court validation with agreement of parties.--If all parties agree, a court may validate a genetic surrogacy agreement after assisted reproduction has occurred but before the birth of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the surrogacy agreement if, upon examination of the parties, the court finds that:(1) sections 9802 (relating to eligibility to enter into surrogacy agreement), 9803 (relating to requirements of surrogacy agreement: process) and 9804 (relating to requirements of surrogacy agreement: content) have been satisfied; and(2) all parties entered into the surrogacy agreement voluntarily and understood its terms.(c) Adjudication of parentage.--If a child conceived by assisted reproduction under a genetic surrogacy agreement that 20250HB0350PN1880 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is not validated under section 9821 is born, the genetic surrogate is not automatically a parent and the court shall adjudicate parentage of the child based on the best interest of the child, taking into account the factors in section 9613(a) (relating to adjudicating competing claims of parentage) and the intent of the parties at the time of the execution of the surrogacy agreement.(d) Standing.--The parties to a genetic surrogacy agreement have standing to maintain a proceeding to adjudicate parentage under this section.§ 9825. Genetic surrogacy agreement; parentage status of deceased intended parent.(a) Death after gamete or embryo transfer.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9823 (relating to parentage under validated genetic surrogacy agreement) or 9824 (relating to effect of nonvalidated genetic surrogacy agreement), on birth of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under a genetic surrogacy agreement, each intended parent is, by operation of law, a parent of the child, notwithstanding the death of an intended parent during the period between the transfer of a gamete or embryo and the birth of the child.(b) Death before gamete or embryo transfer.--Except as otherwise provided in section 9823 or 9824, an intended parent is not a parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under a genetic surrogacy agreement if the intended parent dies before the transfer of a gamete or embryo unless:(1) the surrogacy agreement provides otherwise;(2) the transfer of the gamete or embryo occurs not later than 36 months after the death of the intended parent or birth of the child occurs not later than 45 months after 20250HB0350PN1880 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the death of the intended parent; and(3) the estate of the deceased intended parent is notified not later than six months after the death of the intended parent that the transfer may occur.§ 9826. Breach of genetic surrogacy agreement.(a) Remedies for breach.--Subject to section 9822(b) (relating to termination of genetic surrogacy agreement), if a genetic surrogacy agreement is breached by a genetic surrogate or one or more intended parents, the nonbreaching party is entitled to the remedies available at law or in equity.(b) When specific performance permitted.--Specific performance is a remedy available for:(1) breach of a validated genetic surrogacy agreement by a genetic surrogate of a requirement which prevents an intended parent from exercising the full rights of parentage after the birth of the child; or(2) breach by an intended parent which prevents the intended parent's acceptance of duties of parentage after the birth of the child.CHAPTER 99INFORMATION ABOUT DONORSec.9901. Definitions.9902. Applicability.9903. Collection of information.9904. Declaration regarding identity disclosure.9905. Disclosure of identifying information and medical history.9904. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION.9906 9905 . Recordkeeping. 20250HB0350PN1880 - 81 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9901. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Identifying information." All of the following:(1) the full name of a donor;(2) the date of birth of the donor; and(3) the permanent and, if different, current telephone number, email address and address of the donor at the time of the donation."Medical history." Clinically relevant information known to the donor at the time of collection regarding a:(1) present illness of a donor;(2) past illness of the donor; and(3) genetic and family history pertaining to the health of the donor.§ 9902. Applicability.This chapter applies only to gametes collected on or after the effective date of this section.§ 9903. Collection of information.A gamete bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth shall:(1) collect from a donor the donor's identifying information and medical history at the time of the donation;(2) collect from any other gamete bank or fertility clinic from which it receives gametes of a donor the name, address, telephone number and email address of the other gamete bank or fertility clinic; and(3) disclose the information collected under paragraphs (1) and (2) in accordance with section 9905 (relating to 20250HB0350PN1880 - 82 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disclosure of identifying information and medical history).§ 9904. Declaration regarding identity disclosure.(a) Duties.--A gamete bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth which collects gametes from a donor shall:(1) provide the donor with information in a record about the donor's choice regarding identity disclosure; and(2) obtain a declaration from the donor regarding identity disclosure.(b) Options for donors.--A gamete bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth shall give a donor the choice to sign a declaration, attested by a notarial officer or witnessed, that either:(1) states that the donor agrees to disclose the donor's identity to a child conceived by assisted reproduction with the donor's gametes on request once the child attains 18 years of age; or(2) states that the donor does not agree presently to disclose the donor's identity to the child.(c) Withdrawal of declarations.--A gamete bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth shall permit a donor who has signed a declaration under subsection (b)(2) to withdraw the declaration at any time by signing a declaration under subsection (b)(1).§ 9905. Disclosure of identifying information and medical history.(a) Duty to provide identifying information.--On request of a child conceived by assisted reproduction who attains 18 years of age, a gamete bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth which collected the gametes used in 20250HB0350PN1880 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the assisted reproduction shall make a good faith effort to provide the child with identifying information of the donor who provided the gametes, unless the donor signed and did not withdraw a declaration under section 9904(b)(2) (relating to declaration regarding identity disclosure). If the donor signed and did not withdraw the declaration, the gamete bank or fertility clinic shall make a good faith effort to notify the donor, who may elect under section 9904(c) to withdraw the donor's declaration.(b) Duty to provide nonidentifying medical history of donor.--Regardless of whether a donor signed a declaration under section 9904(b)(2), on request by a child conceived by assisted reproduction who attains 18 years of age, or, if the child is a minor, by a parent or guardian of the child, a gamete bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth which collected the gamete used in the assisted reproduction shall make a good faith effort to provide the child or, if the child is a minor, the parent or guardian of the child, access to nonidentifying medical history of the donor.(c) Duty to disclose information about gamete bank or fertility clinic.--On request of a child conceived by assisted reproduction who attains 18 years of age, a gamete bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth which received gametes used in the assisted reproduction from another gamete bank or fertility clinic shall disclose the name, address, telephone number and email address of the other gamete bank or fertility clinic from which it received the gametes.(3) DISCLOSE NONIDENTIFYING MEDICAL HISTORY INFORMATION COLLECTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) AND THE INFORMATION COLLECTED 20250HB0350PN1880 - 84 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 9904 (RELATING TO DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION).§ 9904. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION.(A) NONIDENTIFYING MEDICAL HISTORY OF DONOR. --UPON REQUEST OF A CHILD CONCEIVED BY ASSISTED REPRODUCTION WHO HAS ATTAINED 18 YEARS OF AGE, OR BY A PARENT OR GUARDIAN ON BEHALF OF A MINOR CHILD, A GAMETE BANK OR FERTILITY CLINIC AUTHORIZED TO OPERATE UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH AND WHICH COLLECTED THE GAMETE USED IN THE ASSISTED REPRODUCTION SHALL MAKE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO PROVIDE ACCESS TO THE DONOR'S NONIDENTIFYING MEDICAL HISTORY TO THE REQUESTER.(B) INFORMATION ABOUT SOURCE GAMETE BANK OR FERTILITY CLINIC.-- UPON REQUEST OF A CHILD CONCEIVED BY ASSISTED REPRODUCTION WHO HAS ATTAINED 18 YEARS OF AGE, A GAMETE BANK OR FERTILITY CLINIC AUTHORIZED TO OPERATE UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH THAT RECEIVED THE GAMETES USED IN THE ASSISTED REPRODUCTION FROM ANOTHER GAMETE BANK OR FERTILITY CLINIC SHALL DISCLOSE THE NAME, ADDRESS, TELEPHONE NUMBER AND EMAIL ADDRESS OF THE GAMETE BANK OR FERTILITY CLINIC FROM WHICH THE GAMETES WERE RECEIVED.§ 9906 9905 . Recordkeeping. (a) Donor information.--A gamete bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth which collects gametes for use in assisted reproduction shall maintain identifying information and medical history about each gamete donor. The gamete bank or fertility clinic shall maintain records of gamete screening and testing and comply with reporting requirements, in accordance with Federal law and applicable law of this Commonwealth other than this part.(b) Gamete bank or fertility clinic information.--A gamete 20250HB0350PN1880 - 85 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bank or fertility clinic authorized by law to operate in this Commonwealth which receives gametes from another gamete bank or fertility clinic shall maintain the name, address, telephone number and email address of the gamete bank or fertility clinic from which it received the gametes.CHAPTER 99AMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.99A01. Uniformity of application and construction.99A02. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.99A03. Transitional provision.§ 99A01. Uniformity of application and construction.In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.§ 99A02. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.To the extent permitted by section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (Public Law 106-229, 15 U.S.C. § 7002), this part may supersede provisions of that act.§ 99A03. Transitional provision.This part applies to a pending proceeding to adjudicate parentage commenced before the effective date of this section for an issue on which a judgment has not been entered.Section 9. Section 931(c) of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 931. Original jurisdiction and venue.* * *(c) Venue and process.--Except as provided by section 5101.1 20250HB0350PN1880 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to venue in medical professional liability actions) [and], Subchapter B of Chapter 85 (relating to actions against Commonwealth parties) and 23 Pa.C.S. § 9605 (relating to venue), the venue of a court of common pleas concerning matters over which jurisdiction is conferred by this section shall be as prescribed by general rule. The process of the court shall extend beyond the territorial limits of the judicial district to the extent prescribed by general rule. Except as otherwise prescribed by general rule, in a proceeding to enforce an order of a government agency the process of the court shall extend throughout this Commonwealth.Section 10. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 11. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0350PN1880 - 87 - 1234567891011121314